Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2061.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2912-D and 2935-D(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 2912-D. Application for certification.To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes 123456789101112131415161718192021 the following:* * *(4.1) (i) For construction, expansion, rehabilitation, renovation or site work of a computer data center beginning on or after July 1, 2025, an affirmation signed by the authorized executive representing the owner or operator that all contractors and subcontractors shall pay workers not less than the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for each craft or classification, as determined and enforced by the Department of Labor and Industry consistent with the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, for performing on-site: (A) construction;(B) expansion;(C) renovation;(D) rehabilitation;(E) reconstruction;(F) demolition;(G) alteration; and(H) repair work, other than routine maintenance work.(ii) The requirements of subparagraph (i) shall apply regardless of whether the project meets other coverage limitations described under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.* * *Section 2935-D. Eligibility requirements.(a) General rule.--In order to be certified under this subarticle, an owner or operator of a computer data center must 20250HB2061PN2645 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meet all of the following requirements:* * *(3) (i) For construction, expansion, rehabilitation, renovation or site work of a computer data center beginning on or after July 1, 2025, an affirmation signed by the owner or operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center must ensure that all contractors and subcontractors shall pay workers not less than the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for each craft or classification, as determined and enforced by the Department of Labor and Industry consistent with the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, for performing on-site: (A) construction;(B) expansion;(C) renovation;(D) rehabilitation;(E) reconstruction;(F) demolition;(G) alteration; and(H) repair work, other than routine maintenance work.(ii) The requirements of subparagraph (i) shall apply regardless of whether the project meets other coverage limitations described under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2061PN2645 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728